Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE G. NON-BACCALAUREATE SYSTEM

CHAPTER 133. APPRENTICESHIP SYSTEM OF ADULT CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY EDUCATION

Sec. 133.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Apprenticeship training program" means a training program that provides on-the-job training, preparatory instruction, supplementary instruction, or related instruction in a trade that has been certified as an apprenticeable occupation by the Office of Apprenticeship.

(2) "Preparatory instruction" means a course of instruction lasting six months or less that teaches the basic skills required for an individual to comply with the terms of the individual's apprenticeship agreement as required by Section 133.002(d).

(3) "Supplementary instruction" means a course of instruction for persons employed as journeymen craftsmen in apprenticeable trades that is designed to provide new skills or upgrade current skills.

(4) "Related instruction" means organized, off-the-job instruction in theoretical or technical subjects required for the completion of an apprenticeship program for a particular apprenticeable trade.

(5) "Commission" means the Texas Workforce Commission.

(6) "Office of Apprenticeship" means the Office of Apprenticeship of the United States Department of Labor.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 771, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.01 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.54, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 264 (H.B. 1799), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 133.002. GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING PROGRAMS. (a) Pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the commission may allocate state funds for the support of apprenticeship training programs that meet the criteria set forth in this chapter.

(b) A program may be conducted by an independent apprenticeship committee or may be sponsored by a public school district or a state postsecondary institution pursuant to a contract between the district or institution and an apprenticeship committee.

(c) A program must be under the direction of an apprenticeship committee whose members are appointed by one or more employers of apprentices, one or more bargaining agents representing members of an apprenticeable trade, or a combination of the above, and the committee shall perform the duties set forth in Section 133.003. If an apprenticeship committee is composed of representatives of one or more employers and one or more bargaining agents, the number of committee members designated by the employer or employers shall be equal to the number of committee members designated by the bargaining agent or agents.

(d) Each apprentice participating in a program must be given a written apprenticeship agreement by the apprenticeship committee stating the standards and conditions of the apprentice's employment and training. The standards must conform substantially with the standards of apprenticeship for the particular trade which have been adopted by the Office of Apprenticeship.

(e) An apprentice may not be charged tuition or fees by a public school district or state postsecondary institution other than an administrative fee to cover the costs of processing the apprentice's records which shall not exceed $5 for each course in which the apprentice is enrolled.

(f) Funding for a program sponsored by a public school district or state postsecondary institution, in addition to any other money available, shall be provided by the apprenticeship committee pursuant to the terms of the contract referred to in Subsection (b).

(g) An apprenticeship training program must provide adequate facilities, personnel, and resources to effectively administer the program in a manner consistent with the public's need for skilled craftsmen and the apprentices' need for marketable skills in apprenticeable occupations.

(h) A program must be registered with the Office of Apprenticeship and approved by the commission.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.02 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.55, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 498 (H.B. 2790), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 264 (H.B. 1799), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 133.003. DUTIES OF APPRENTICESHIP COMMITTEE. The apprenticeship committee for each apprenticeship training program shall:

(1) establish standards and goals for preparatory instruction, supplementary instruction, and related instruction for apprentices in the program;

(2) establish rules governing the on-the-job training and other instruction for apprentices in the program;

(3) plan and organize instructional materials designed to provide technical and theoretical knowledge and basic skills required by apprentices in the program;

(4) recommend qualified instructions for the program;

(5) monitor and evaluate the performance and progress of each apprentice in the program and the program as a whole;

(6) interview applicants and select those most qualified for entrance into the program;

(7) provide for the keeping of records of the on-the-job training and progress of each apprentice;

(8) encourage instructors to maintain recommended qualifications; and

(9) perform any other duties which, in the opinion of the apprenticeship committee, promote the goals of individual apprentices and of the program as a whole.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.03 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 133.004. NOTICE OF AVAILABLE FUNDS. In order to insure that all citizens of Texas have an equal opportunity to benefit from apprenticeship training programs, the commission shall provide for statewide publication in a manner recommended by the advisory committee and intended to give actual notice to all potential program sponsors of the amount of funds that will be available to support apprenticeship training programs during the current and following fiscal years, the qualifications required of program sponsors and apprenticeship committees, and the procedures to be followed in applying for state funds. The notice may also include other information recommended by the advisory committee and approved by the commission. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the commission shall publish any information concerning available funds given to a particular program sponsor in a manner recommended by the advisory committee and intended to give actual notice to all potential program sponsors statewide.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.04 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.56, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 133.005. AUDIT PROCEDURES. (a) The commission shall maintain a clear audit trail of all funds appropriated for the apprenticeship system of adult career and technology education. For each course that is funded, the audit trail shall include the following records:

(1) the name of the sponsoring public school district or state postsecondary institution or of the apprenticeship committee offering the course if the apprenticeship training program is not sponsored by a public school district or state postsecondary institution;

(2) the name of the instructor;

(3) the number of students enrolled;

(4) the place and schedule of class meetings; and

(5) certification by the bureau for preparatory and related instruction courses that the students enrolled were registered apprentices.

(b) A public school district, state postsecondary institution, or apprenticeship committee operating an apprenticeship training program not sponsored by a public school district or state postsecondary institution that receives funds shall maintain a clear audit trail which shall include records of receipts for all expenditures relating solely to each particular course. Where an expense is shared by two or more courses, the allocation to that expense from the funds for a particular course shall be supported by a formula based on the comparative benefit derived by each course from the expense. No charges for the depreciation of facilities or the retirement of indebtedness shall be allocated to an apprenticeship course.

(c) Funds appropriated for the apprenticeship system of adult vocational education shall not be commingled with funds appropriated for other purposes.

(d) All state funds appropriated to the commission pursuant to this chapter are subject to audit by the state auditor in accordance with Chapter 321, Government Code. Funds received pursuant to this chapter by a school district or postsecondary institution are subject to audit as otherwise provided by law.

(e) All records, receipts, working papers, and other components of the audit trail shall be public records.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 23, ch. 19, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 1981; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 584, Sec. 86, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.07 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.57, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 498 (H.B. 2790), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 133.006. APPROPRIATION AND DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS. (a) On recommendation of the advisory committee the commission shall adopt formulas and administrative procedures to be used in requesting appropriations of state funds as a budgetary line item for the Apprenticeship System of Adult Career and Technology Education.

(b) At least annually, the commission shall prepare and submit to the Texas Workforce Investment Council or to the Apprenticeship and Training Advisory Committee, as designated by the Texas Workforce Investment Council, a report that includes:

(1) an apprenticeship-related instruction cost study for the most recent state fiscal year; and

(2) the funding distribution for apprenticeship-related instruction programs for the state fiscal year in which the report is submitted.

(c) On recommendation of the advisory committee the commission shall adopt forms, formulas, and administrative procedures for the distribution of available funds to apprenticeship training programs. Distribution formulas must be uniform in application to all local program sponsors.

(d) On recommendation of the advisory committee the commission shall reserve until December 1 of each year a percentage of the funds appropriated under the line item described in this section to be used solely for apprenticeship-related instruction programs. This percentage shall be established by the formulas required by this section. Reserved funds that are not obligated on December 1 may be used for preparatory and supplementary instruction programs as well as related instruction programs.

(e) No funds shall be distributed to a public school district, state postsecondary institution, or apprenticeship committee until the district, institution, or committee has filed all reports required by this chapter and by the commission.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.08 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.58, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 498 (H.B. 2790), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 264 (H.B. 1799), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 133.007. RULES. The commission shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.09 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.59, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 133.008. STATUS OF RECOMMENDATIONS. (a) Recommendations of the advisory committee submitted to the commission must be acted on, and either accepted or rejected.

(b) A recommendation which is rejected must be returned immediately to the advisory committee, accompanied by written notice of the reasons for rejecting the recommendation.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.10 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.60, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 133.009. APPLICABILITY. The provisions of this chapter apply only to those apprenticeship training programs which receive state funds pursuant to the provisions of Section 133.002.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 621, ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Redesignated from Education Code Sec. 33.11 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 1995.